Tennessee, session 114, HB1184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-6-136(a), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(a) It is unlawful for a person, firm, or corporation to represent itself as a licensed
contractor or to act in the capacity of a "contractor" as defined in § 62-6-102, and related
rules of this state, or similar statutes, rules, and regulations of another state, while not
licensed, unless such person, firm, or corporation has been duly licensed under § 62-6-
103.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-6-136(b), is amended by deleting
"§ 62-37-114 or § 62-37-127,".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1184
003124
- 1 -